Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2093
Receivership; payment of expenses.

The health care facility for which a receiver is appointed shall be responsible for payment of the expenses of a receivership established under section 71-2086 unless the court directs otherwise. The expenses include, but are not limited to:

(1) Compensation for the receiver and any related receivership expenses approved by the court;

(2) Expenses incurred by the health care facility for the continuing care of the residents or patients of the health care facility;

(3) Expenses incurred by the health care facility for the maintenance of buildings and grounds of the health care facility; and

(4) Expenses incurred by the health care facility in the ordinary course of business, such as employees' salaries and accounts payable.

Laws 1983, LB 274, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-6005;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 69;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 18.